Hawaii statutes.
§237-11 Tax year. The assessment of
taxes herein made and the returns required therefor shall be for the year
ending on December 31. If the taxpayer, in exercising a privilege taxable
under this chapter, keeps the taxpayer's books reflecting the same on a basis
other than the calendar year, the taxpayer may, with the assent of the
department of taxation, and upon the direction of the department shall, make
the taxpayer's annual returns and pay taxes for the year covering the
taxpayer's accounting period as shown by the method of keeping the taxpayer's
books. [L 1935, c 141, §10; RL 1945, §5452; RL 1955, §117-12; am L 1957, c 34,
§4; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §16; HRS §237-11; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next